zh-CN: 交响大鼓支架类型: 摇篮式支架; 场地支架/便携式支架; 兼容背带（可转换）; 悬挂式环形支架; T 型腿支架; 其他
nb: Stativ for montering av konsertbasstromme: Vuggestativ; Feltramme / bærbart stativ; Selekompatibel (konverterbar); Stativ med opphengsring; T-beinstativ; Annet
sv: Stativ för konsertbastrummor: Vaggstativ; Fältram/bärbart stativ; Kompatibel med sele (konverterbar); Stativ med upphängd ring; T-bensstativ; Annat
sl-SI: Vrsta stojala za koncertni bas boben: Zibelasto stojalo; Terenski okvir/prenosno stojalo; Združljivo s pasom (pretvorljivo); Stojalo z visečim obročem; Stojalo s T-nogami; Drugo
zh-TW: 音樂會大鼓安裝支架類型: 搖籃式鼓架; 戶外用框架/可攜式鼓架; 適用背負式 (可轉換); 懸吊環式鼓架; T 型腳架; 其他
nl: Type montagestandaard voor concertbasdrum: Wiegstandaard; Veldframe/draagbare standaard; Compatibel met harnas (om te bouwen); Hangende ringstandaard; Standaard met T-poten; Overig
vi: Loại giá đỡ trống bass hòa nhạc: Chân đế kiểu nôi; Khung dã chiến/chân đế di động; Tương thích với đai đeo (có thể chuyển đổi); Chân đế có vòng treo; Chân đế chữ T; Khác
da: Type stativ til montering af koncertbasstromme: Vuggestativ; Feltstativ/bærbart stativ; Selekompatibel (konvertibel); Stativ med ophængningsring; T-bensstativ; Andet
fr: Type de support de montage pour grosse caisse de concert: Support en berceau; Châssis de terrain/Support portable; Compatible avec un harnais (convertible); Support à anneau suspendu; Support en T; Autre
sk-SK: Typ stojana na koncertný basový bubon: Kolískový stojan; Poľný rám/prenosný stojan; Kompatibilné s popruhom (konvertibilné); Stojan so závesným kruhom; Stojan s nohami v tvare T; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta stalka za montažu koncertnog bas bubnja: Stalak u obliku kolijevke; Terenski/prijenosni stalak; Kompatibilno s pojasom (prilagodljivo); Stalak s visećim prstenom; Stalak s T-nogama; Ostalo
pt-PT: Suporte de montagem para bombo de concerto: Suporte de berço; Estrutura de campo/suporte portátil; Compatível com arnês (convertível); Suporte de anel suspenso; Suporte com pernas em T; Outro
pt-BR: Tipos de suporte de montagem para bumbo de concerto: Suporte tipo berço; Estrutura de campo/suporte portátil; Compatível com colete (conversível); Suporte de anel suspenso; Suporte com pés em T; Outro
lt-LT: Koncertinio bosinio būgno montavimo stovo tipas: Lopšio tipo stovas; Lauko rėmas / nešiojamasis stovas; Suderinamas su diržais (konvertuojamas); Pakabinamas žiedo tipo stovas; T formos kojelių stovas; Kita
ru: Тип стойки для крепления концертного бас-барабана: Стойка-люлька; Полевая рама / портативная стойка; Совместима с подвесной системой (трансформер); Стойка с подвесным кольцом; Стойка с Т-образными ножками; Другое
bg-BG: Тип стойка/монтаж за концертен бас барабан: Стойка тип люлка; Полева рамка/преносима стойка; Съвместима с ремъци (трансформираща се); Стойка с окачен ринг; Стойка с Т-образни крака; Друга
ko: 콘서트 베이스드럼 장착 스탠드 유형: 크래들 스탠드; 필드 프레임/휴대용 스탠드; 하네스 호환(변환 가능); 서스펜디드 링 스탠드; T-레그 스탠드; 기타
pl: Typ statywu montażowego bębna basowego koncertowego: Stojak kołyskowy; Rama marszowa / stojak przenośny; Zgodny z uprzężą (konwertowalny); Stojak z pierścieniem podwieszanym; Stojak typu T; Inne
fi: Konserttibassorumpujen kiinnitystelinetyyppi: Kehtoteline; Kenttäteline / siirrettävä teline; Yhteensopiva valjaiden kanssa (muunnettava); Ripustusrengasteline; T-jalkateline; Muu
tr: Konser bas davulu montaj standı tipi: Beşik sehpa; Saha iskeleti/Taşınabilir sehpa; Askı uyumlu (dönüştürülebilir); Asma halka sehpası; T ayaklı sehpa; Diğer
en: Concert bass drum mounting stand type: Cradle stand; Field frame/portable stand; Harness-compatible (convertible); Suspended ring stand; T-leg stand; Other
cs: Typ stojanu pro montáž koncertního basového bubnu: Kolébkový stojan; Pojízdný rám / přenosný stojan; Kompatibilní s popruhy (konvertibilní); Závěsný kruhový stojan; Stojan s nohami ve tvaru T; Jiné
hu: Zenekari nagydob rögzítési típusa: Bölcsőállvány; Terepi keret / hordozható állvány; Hevederrel kompatibilis (átalakítható); Felfüggesztett gyűrűs állvány; T-lábas állvány; Egyéb
th: ขาตั้งกลองเบสคอนเสิร์ต: ขาตั้งแบบเปล; โครงสำหรับภาคสนาม/ขาตั้งแบบพกพา; รองรับสายสะพาย (ปรับเปลี่ยนได้); ขาตั้งวงแหวนแบบแขวน; ขาตั้งรูปตัว T; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de soporte de montaje para bombo de concierto: Soporte tipo cuna; Marco de campo/soporte portátil; Compatible con arnés (convertible); Soporte de anillo suspendido; Soporte con patas en T; Otro
el: Τύπος βάσης στήριξης για μπάσο τύμπανο συναυλίας: Βάση λίκνο; Εξωτερική/φορητή βάση; Συμβατό με εξάρτυση (μετατρέψιμο); Βάση αιωρούμενου δακτυλίου; Βάση με πόδια T; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip suport de montare pentru tobă bas de concert: Stativ tip leagăn; Cadru de teren/stativ portabil; Compatibil cu ham (convertibil); Stativ cu inel de suspendare; Stativ cu picioare în T; Altele
de: Typ des Montageständers für Konzert-Basstrommeln: Wiegenständer; Feldrahmen/Tragbarer Ständer; Gurtzeugkompatibel (umrüstbar); Hängering-Ständer; T-Bein-Ständer; Sonstige
ja: コンサートバスドラム用マウントスタンドタイプ: クレードルスタンド; フィールドフレーム / ポータブルスタンド; ハーネス対応 (コンバーチブル); サスペンデッドリングスタンド; Tレッグスタンド; その他
it: Supporto per grancassa da concerto: Supporto a culla; Telaio da campo/supporto portatile; Compatibile con imbracatura (convertibile); Supporto ad anello sospeso; Supporto con gambe a T; Altro